Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 7. Third Party Liability for Medical Payments.

§ 43-13-301.
Identification of cases involving third-party liability.

The State Department of Public Welfare shall assist the Division of Medicaid in the Office of the Governor in identifying cases involving third-party liability, including without limitation, third-party insurance benefits, health insurance or other health coverage maintained by the recipient or absent parent through intake, initial determinations, and redeterminations of eligibility, and shall promptly transmit such information to the Division of Medicaid or the fiscal agent of the Division of Medicaid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 497, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 43-13-303.
Inclusion of medical support in child support enforcement orders; procedures for health insurance enrollment in child support cases; duties of health insurers and employers; withholding of reimbursement amounts from parent’s state tax refund.

The Department of Human Services, in administering its child support enforcement program on behalf of Medicaid and non-Medicaid recipients, or any other attorney representing a Medicaid recipient, shall include a prayer for medical support in complaints and other pleadings in obtaining a child support order whenever health-care coverage is available to the absent parent at a reasonable cost. Nothing in this section shall be construed to contradict the provisions of Section 43-19-101(6).

Health insurance enrollment shall be on the form prescribed by the Department of Human Services unless a court or administrative order stipulates an alternative form of health-care coverage other than employer-based coverage. Employers must complete the employer response and return to the Department of Human Services within twenty (20) days. Employers must transfer the Medical Support Notice to Plan Administrator Part B to the appropriate group health plan providing any such health-care coverage for which the child(ren) is eligible within twenty (20) business days after the date of the notice. Employers must withhold any obligation of the employee for employee contributions necessary for coverage of the child(ren) and send any amount withheld directly to the plan. Employees may contest the withholding based on a mistake of fact. If the employee contests such withholding, the employer must initiate withholding until such time as the employer receives notice that the contest is resolved. Employers must notify the Department of Human Services promptly whenever the noncustodial parent’s employment is terminated in the same manner as required for income withholding cases.

Health insurers, including, but not limited to, ERISA plans, preferred provider organizations, and HMOs, shall not have contracts that limit or exclude payments if the individual is eligible for Medicaid, is not claimed as a dependent on the federal income tax return, or does not reside with the parent or in the insurer’s service area.

Health insurers and employers shall honor court or administrative orders by permitting enrollment of a child or children at any time and by allowing enrollment by the custodial parent, the Division of Medicaid, or the Child Support Enforcement Agency if the absent parent fails to enroll the child(ren).

The health insurer and the employer shall not disenroll a child unless written documentation substantiates that the court order is no longer in effect, the child will be enrolled through another insurer, or the employer has eliminated family health coverage for all of its employees.

The employer shall allow payroll deduction for the insurance premium from the absent parent’s wages and pay the insurer. The health insurer and the employer shall not impose requirements on the Medicaid recipient that are different from those applicable to any other individual. The health insurer shall provide pertinent information to the custodial parent to allow the child to obtain benefits and shall permit custodial parents to submit claims to the insurer.

The health insurer and employer shall notify the Division of Medicaid and the Department of Human Services when lapses in coverage occur in court-ordered insurance. If the noncustodial parent has provided such coverage and has changed employment, and the new employer provides health-care coverage, the Department of Human Services shall transfer notice of the provision to the employer, which notice shall operate to enroll the child in the noncustodial parent’s health plan, unless the noncustodial parent contests the notice. The health insurer and employer shall allow payments to the provider of medical services, shall honor the assignment of rights to third-party sources by the Medicaid recipient and the subrogation rights of the Division of Medicaid as set forth in Section 43-13-305, Mississippi Code of 1972, and shall permit payment to the custodial parent.

The employer shall allow the Division of Medicaid to garnish wages of the absent parent when such parent has received payment from the third party for medical services rendered to the insured child and such parent has failed to reimburse the Division of Medicaid to the extent of the medical service payment.

Any insurer or the employer who fails to comply with the provisions of this subsection shall be liable to the Division of Medicaid to the extent of payments made to the provider of medical services rendered to a recipient to which the third party or parties, is, are, or may be liable.

The Division of Medicaid shall report to the Mississippi State Tax Commission an absent parent who has received third-party payment(s) for medical services rendered to the insured child and who has not reimbursed the Division of Medicaid for the related medical service payment(s). The Mississippi State Tax Commission shall withhold from the absent parent’s state tax refund, and pay to the Division of Medicaid, the amount of the third-party payment(s) for medical services rendered to the insured child and not reimbursed to the Division of Medicaid for the related medical service payment(s).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 497, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 7; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 139; Laws, 2003, ch. 343, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 43-13-305.
Assignment of rights against third parties; appointment of Division as attorney-in-fact; direction of payments to Division.

By accepting Medicaid from the Division of Medicaid in the Office of the Governor, the recipient shall, to the extent of the payment of medical expenses by the Division of Medicaid, be deemed to have made an assignment to the Division of Medicaid of any and all rights and interests in any third-party benefits, hospitalization or indemnity contract or any cause of action, past, present or future, against any person, firm or corporation for Medicaid benefits provided to the recipient by the Division of Medicaid for injuries, disease or sickness caused or suffered under circumstances creating a cause of action in favor of the recipient against any such person, firm or corporation as set out in Section 43-13-125. The recipient shall be deemed, without the necessity of signing any document, to have appointed the Division of Medicaid as his or her true and lawful attorney-in-fact in his or her name, place and stead in collecting any and all amounts due and owing for medical expenses paid by the Division of Medicaid against such person, firm or corporation.

Whenever a provider of medical services or the Division of Medicaid submits claims to an insurer on behalf of a Medicaid recipient for whom an assignment of rights has been received, or whose rights have been assigned by the operation of law, the insurer must respond within sixty (60) days of receipt of a claim by forwarding payment or issuing a notice of denial directly to the submitter of the claim. The failure of the insuring entity to comply with the provisions of this section shall subject the insuring entity to recourse by the Division of Medicaid in accordance with the provision of Section 43-13-315. The Division of Medicaid shall be authorized to endorse any and all, including, but not limited to, multi-payee checks, drafts, money orders or other negotiable instruments representing Medicaid payment recoveries that are received by the Division of Medicaid.

Court orders or agreements for medical support shall direct such payments to the Division of Medicaid, which shall be authorized to endorse any and all checks, drafts, money orders or other negotiable instruments representing medical support payments which are received. Any designated medical support funds received by the State Department of Human Services or through its local county departments shall be paid over to the Division of Medicaid. When medical support for a Medicaid recipient is available through an absent parent or custodial parent, the insuring entity shall direct the medical support payment(s) to the provider of medical services or to the Division of Medicaid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 497, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 579, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 609, § 7; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 43-13-307.
Loss of eligibility upon refusal to cooperate with Division or local agency.

Any applicant or recipient, inclusive of the grantee relative of a dependent child who refuses to cooperate with or to provide reasonable assistance to the Division of Medicaid against a liable third party in accordance with Section 43-13-125, Mississippi Code of 1972, or fails to pay over to the Division of Medicaid third-party payments as provided in this article, or fails or refuses to cooperate with the local county department of public welfare shall not be eligible for Medicaid benefits under the Mississippi Medicaid Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 497, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 43-13-309.
State and federal funding.

The State Department of Public Welfare shall obtain an appropriation of state funds from the State Legislature in carrying out its medical support responsibilities under this article and shall organize its programs and budgets in such a manner as to secure maximum federal funding directly or through the Division of Medicaid under Title XIX of the Federal Social Security Act, as amended. If Title XIX federal funds are secured through the Division of Medicaid, such funds shall not be considered a part of the budget of the Division of Medicaid in providing medical assistance under the Mississippi Medical Assistance Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 497, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 43-13-311.
Requirement of cooperation by providers.

Providers of medical services participating in the Medicaid program shall, in submitting claims for the payment of services, identify, if known to the provider, the third party or parties who are or may be liable for the injuries, disease, or sickness of the recipient and shall cooperate with the Division of Medicaid in the recoupment of the payments from such third party or parties.

Any provider submitting claims for the payment of medical services by the Division of Medicaid, who, having knowledge of the liability or potential liability of a third party for the injuries, disease, or sickness of the recipient, fails to identify such third party or parties to the Division of Medicaid or who fails to cooperate with the Division of Medicaid in the recoupment of its payments from such third party or parties shall be liable to the Division of Medicaid to the extent of the payments made to the provider for medical assistance or services rendered to a recipient to which the third party or parties is, are, or may be liable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 497, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 43-13-313.
Denotation on medical information furnished by provider; provider to direct copy of medical information and authorization to Division of Medicaid; effect of failure to comply.

In furnishing medical information to the recipient, his attorney or any other party upon written authorization, a provider participating in the Medicaid program shall denote in writing on such medical information that the patient is a Medicaid recipient and his Medicaid identification number, and if the medical charges have been paid by the Division of Medicaid, the provider shall, in addition, write or cause to be stamped or printed thereon “paid by the Division of Medicaid.” If the provider has not been paid by the Division of Medicaid but seeks to bill the Division of Medicaid for medical services rendered the recipient, the provider shall denote in writing on such medical information the same information as herein provided and shall advise the recipient, his attorney, or any other party upon written authorization that it intends to bill the Division of Medicaid for medical services rendered the recipient.

At the time the requested medical information is furnished to the recipient, his attorney, or other party, including medical information produced under court order, subpoena, interrogatory or deposition, the participating provider shall immediately direct a copy of the medical information so furnished or produced to the Division of Medicaid along with the authorization for the production of such information. The failure of the provider of medical services to comply with the provisions of this section shall subject the provider to recourse by the Division of Medicaid in accordance with the provisions of Section 43-13-311.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 497, § 7; Laws, 1989, ch. 408, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 43-13-315.
Liability for failure or refusal to honor subrogation rights of Division.

Any person, firm, or corporation who fails or refuses to honor the subrogation rights of the Division of Medicaid and, specifically, without limitation, hospital insurance and indemnity benefits accruing to a recipient, after advanced written notice and a reasonable opportunity of responding, shall be liable to the division, should suit become necessary by the division and liability be established, for double the amount of Medicaid benefits paid by the Division of Medicaid or double the amount of the insurance policy limits, whichever is the lesser, inclusive of the assessment of a reasonable attorney’s fee and all costs of court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 497, § 8; Laws, 1995, ch. 614, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 43-13-317.
Recovery of Medicaid payments from estate of deceased recipient; waiver of claim.

The division shall be noticed as an identified creditor against the estate of any deceased Medicaid recipient under Section 91-7-145.

In accordance with applicable federal law and rules and regulations, including those under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, the division may seek recovery of payments for nursing facility services, home- and community-based services and related hospital and prescription drug services from the estate of a deceased Medicaid recipient who was fifty-five (55) years of age or older when he or she received the assistance. The claim shall be waived by the division (a) if there is a surviving spouse; or (b) if there is a surviving dependent who is under the age of twenty-one (21) years or who is blind or disabled; or (c) as provided by federal law and regulation, if it is determined by the division or by court order that there is undue hardship.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 8; Laws, 2004, ch. 593, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2004.